Massachusetts, session 194th, H1609.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 178C of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Agency”, the following
new definition:- “Electronic alias, address and domain”, any electronic mail, website
registrations, messaging and chat service aliases, websites and domains either personally owned
and operated or otherwise owned and operated by a third party with the purpose of displaying,
soliciting or otherwise posting information, entries and aliases associated with either web-based
applications and databases, or aliases used and/or stored on personal computers that may be
transmitted for use during any communication.
of 4

SECTION 2. Section 178D of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subparagraph (a) by inserting after the words “aliases
used,” in line 12 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 3. Section 178D of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in the second paragraph by striking out, in line 40, clause (i), and inserting in
place thereof the following new clause:- (i) the name of the sex offender, and the offender’s
electronic aliases, addresses and domains;
SECTION 4. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting after the words “the sex offender’s name,” in lines 38-39 the
following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 5. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting after the words “failure to do so” in line 71 the following:- to give
notice of a change of electronic alias, address or domain, or the addition of an electronic alias,
address or domain and the penalties for failure to do so,
SECTION 6. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (b) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in line 82
the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 7. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (c) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in lines
118-119 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
of 4

SECTION 8. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (g) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in lines
172-173 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 9. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (h) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in line 192
the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 10. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended in paragraph (l) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in
line 243 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 11. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended in paragraph (o) by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in
line 279 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 12. Section 178E of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended in paragraph (q) by inserting after the words “the student’s name,” in
line 307 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 13. Section 178F of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in the first paragraph by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in line
7 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
SECTION 14. Section 178F of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in the first paragraph by inserting after the words “sex offender’s name,” in line
19 the following:- all electronic aliases, addresses and domains,
of 4

SECTION 15. Section 178H of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (a) by striking out, in line 3, clause (iii), and inserting in place
thereof the following new clause:- (iii) fails to provide notice of a change of address, and fails to
give notice of a change of electronic alias, address or domain, or the addition of an electronic
alias, address or domain;
SECTION 16. Section 178J of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in clause (1) of paragraph (b) by inserting after the words “specific individual
by name” in line 28 the following:- , electronic alias, address or domain
SECTION 17. Section 178J of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in paragraph (c) by striking out, in line 50, clause (1), and inserting in place
thereof the following new clause:- (1) the name of the sex offender, and the offender’s electronic
aliases, addresses, and domains;
SECTION 18. Section 178K of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended in subparagraph (c) of paragraph (2) by striking out, in line 159, clause (i), and
inserting in place thereof the following new clause:- (i) the name of the sex offender, and the
offender’s electronic aliases, addresses and domains;
of 4